California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(B) The Internet resources shall provide links to the appropriate agency or person that may help the family members of the veteran address any issues arising from the ailments specified in subparagraph (A).

(2) Printed material regarding the ailments specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) at any public function of the department.

(b) Update its Internet Web site to prominently display a link to the Network of Care for Veterans and Service Members site, which is an online educational tool for municipal employees and community-based organizations that allows for easier access to information and resources relating to veterans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 515, Sec. 1.   (SB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

(a) By July 1, 2016, the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Create a list of unused or underutilized nonresidential real property owned by the department, including property on or near the premises of existing department facilities.

(2) Propose one or more potential uses of those properties that will benefit California veterans and
 make a preferred recommendation for use of each property, and in doing so, consider uses including, but not limited to, the following services for veterans:

(A) Housing.

(B) Supportive services.

(C) Health care and mental health care.

(b) When identifying the unused or underutilized nonresidential real properties, the department shall consider its inventory of properties as an integrated system, and shall address how prospective uses of the properties could complement each other.

(c) The list of options shall be structured as a prioritized list of projects determined by the department to constitute appropriate uses for the properties identified in the plan.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that after a use option for a given location is identified pursuant to this section, further study and evaluation may be necessary in order to fully determine the feasibility of that use option and take steps toward its implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 641, Sec. 1.   (AB 585)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

714.

(a) The Department of Veterans Affairs and the Department of Consumer Affairs shall both, in consultation with each other, take appropriate steps to increase awareness regarding professional licensing benefits available to veterans and their spouses.

(b) The awareness efforts in subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) Posting information and resources on each department’s respective Internet Web site.

(2) Including information about these benefits in any communications that these agencies have with veterans when it is appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.   (SB 1137)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

715.

(a) The department shall provide one employee, trained and accredited by the department, for every five state prisons to assist incarcerated veterans in applying for and receiving any federal or other veterans’ benefits for which the veterans or their families may be eligible.

(b) The department shall cooperate and collaborate with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to ensure that department employees have
 the greatest access and effectiveness practicable, while taking all necessary safety precautions, in order to assist veterans incarcerated within the state prisons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 599, Sec. 1.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Rendering and Recovery for Benefits [720. - 721.]

720.

Every state and local public agency shall render the service or provide the benefits or assistance it provides to the public to every veteran on the same basis as to any other eligible person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1424, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

721.

If any public agency which has rendered a service, provided benefits, or furnished assistance to a veteran determines that the costs of rendering the service or providing the benefits or assistance are recoverable from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, it shall refer the matter to the county veterans service officer, where applicable, for action pursuant to Section 971 and shall assist the county veterans service officer in any way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 186, Sec. 2.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. The California Military Families Financial Relief Act [800. - 813.]

800.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), in addition to any other benefits provided by law and to the extent permitted by federal law, a reservist who is called to active duty may defer payments on any of the following obligations while serving on active duty, or following a period of active duty:

(1) An obligation secured by a mortgage or deed of trust.

(2) Credit card as defined in Section 1747.02 of the Civil Code.

(3) Retail installment contract as defined in Section 1802.6 of the Civil Code.

(4) Retail installment account, installment account, or revolving account, as defined in
 Section 1802.7 of the Civil Code.

(5) (A) Up to two vehicle loans.

(B) For purposes of this chapter, “vehicle” means a vehicle as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code.

(6) A payment of property tax or any special assessment of in-lieu property tax imposed on real property that is assessed on residential property owned by the reservist and used as that reservist’s primary place of residence on the date the reservist was ordered to active duty.

(7) An obligation owed to a utility company.

(8) A student loan.

(b) (1) In order for an obligation or liability of a reservist to be
 subject to the provisions of this chapter, the reservist or the reservist’s designee shall deliver to the obligor both of the following:

(A) (i) A written request by or on behalf of the reservist for a deferment of financial obligations.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “written request” includes an electronic communication.

(B) A copy of the reservist’s military orders.

(2) If required by a financial institution, proof that the reservist’s employer does not provide continuing income to the reservist while the reservist is on active military duty, including the reservist’s military pay, of more than 90 percent of the reservist’s monthly salary and wage income earned before the call to active duty.

(c) Upon request of the reservist or the reservist’s dependent or designee and within five working days of that request, if applicable, the employer of a reservist shall furnish the letter or other comparable evidence showing that the employer’s compensation policy does not provide continuing income to the reservist, including the reservist’s military pay, of more than 90 percent of the reservist’s monthly salary and wage income earned before the call to active duty.

(d) (1) The deferral period on financial obligations shall be the lesser of 180 days or the period of active duty plus 60 calendar days. The deferral shall apply only to those payments due subsequent to the notice provided to a lender as provided in subdivision (b). In addition, the total period of the deferment shall not exceed 180 days within a 365-day period.

(2) A request for deferral shall be submitted no later than 90 days following the period of active duty on which the deferral is based.

(e) If a lender defers payments on a closed end credit obligation or an open-end credit obligation with a maturity date, pursuant to this chapter, the lender shall extend the term of the obligation by the amount of months the obligation was deferred. However, any mortgage payments deferred pursuant to this section are due and payable upon the sale of the property or other event specified in the documents creating the obligation permitting the lender to accelerate the loan, other than a deferral of payments under this section.

(f) If a lender defers payments on an open-end credit obligation pursuant to this chapter, the lender may restrict the availability of additional credit with
 respect to that obligation during the term of the deferral.

(g) The deferment of payments on an obligation does not limit the ability of the reservist or any other person to make payments on the obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (AB 1854)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

For purposes of this chapter, “mortgage” means an obligation secured by a mortgage or deed of trust, and is limited to an obligation secured by a mortgage or deed of trust for residential property owned by the reservist and used as that reservist’s primary place of residence on the date the reservist was ordered into active duty.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

Nothing in this chapter relieves a reservist with a mortgage subject to an impound account for the payment of property taxes, special assessments, mortgage insurance, and hazard insurance from making monthly payments of an amount which is at least sufficient to pay these amounts, unless the borrower and lender agree to a lesser amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 620, Sec. 9.   (SB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Reservist” means either of the following:

(1) A member of the militia, as defined in Section 120, called or ordered into state military service pursuant to Section 143 or 146 or federal law.

(2) A member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, as defined by Section 101 of Title 10 of the United States Code, who is ordered to active duty pursuant to federal law.

(b) “Military orders” means, with respect to a service member, official
 military orders, or any notification, certification, or verification from the service member’s commanding officer, with respect to the service member’s current or future military duty status.

(c) “Military service” means either of the following:

(1) Full-time active state service or full-time active federal service of a service member who is a member of the militia, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Full-time active duty of a service member who is a reservist, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), for a period of no less than 30 consecutive days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 19.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

During the period specified in Section 800, the reservist may defer the payment of principal and interest on the specified obligations. No penalties shall be imposed on the nonpayment of principal or interest during this period. No interest shall be charged or accumulated on the principal or interest on which the payment was delayed. No foreclosure or repossession of property shall take place during the period of deferment unless otherwise ordered by a court or agreed to by the parties to the obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 620, Sec. 10.   (SB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

Subject to subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 800, a stay, postponement, or suspension under this chapter of the payment of any tax, fine, penalty, insurance premium, or other civil obligation or liability of a person in military service shall not provide the basis for affecting credit ratings, denial or revocation of credit, or a change by the lender in the terms of an existing credit arrangement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

806.

(a) Any entity, which was providing any type of health care coverage, including, but not limited to, health care service plans, specialized health care service plans, and health insurance to a reservist at the time the reservist was ordered to active duty, shall reinstate the health care coverage without waiting periods or exclusion of coverage for preexisting conditions.

(b) Pursuant to Section 1386 of the Health and Safety Code, the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care has the authority to enforce the provisions of this section concerning any person or entity subject to regulation under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and may impose any applicable penalties provided for under that section.

(c) Pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12921 of the Insurance Code, the Insurance Commissioner has the authority to enforce the provisions of this section concerning any person or entity subject to regulation under the Insurance Code, and may impose any applicable penalties provided for under the Insurance Code.

(d) The enforcement and penalty provisions of the act that added this subdivision shall apply only to reservists ordered to active duty on or after January 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

807.

(a) The holder of a loan or retail installment sales contract with respect to which the debtor has purchased prepaid credit disability insurance shall give notice to the debtor not less than 30 days before the expiration date of the insurance that the debtor will not be protected during the period between that expiration date and the deferred maturity date of the loan or contract unless the insurance is extended. The debtor may, at their option, direct the holder to add the amount of the additional premium to the unpaid balance of the loan or contract.

(b) The holder of an open-ended loan or retail installment account with respect to which the
 debtor has purchased credit disability insurance with premiums payable monthly together with the installment payments on the loan or the account shall give notice to the debtor that the debtor will not be protected by the insurance during the period specified in Section 800 unless the debtor elects to continue payment of premiums during that period. The debtor may, at their option, direct the holder to add the amount of those premiums to the unpaid balance of the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 65.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

808.

(a) During the period specified in Section 800, the reservist may defer payments for leased vehicles without breach of the lease or the foreclosure or repossession of the vehicle. If a lender defers payments pursuant to this section, the lender shall extend the term of the lease by the amount of months the lease was deferred.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “vehicle” means a vehicle as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

810.

In those instances where a financial obligation covered by this chapter is sold, any requirement to defer payments as specified in this chapter transfers to the purchaser of the obligation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

811.

(a) The spouse or legal dependent, or both, of a reservist who is called to active duty, shall be entitled to the benefits accorded to a reservist under this chapter, provided that the reservist is eligible for the benefits.

(b) This chapter applies only to an obligation specified in this chapter that was incurred prior to the date that a reservist was called to their current period of active duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 66.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

812.

(a) A person violating any provision of this chapter shall be liable for actual damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs incurred by the service member or other person entitled to the benefits and protections of this chapter.

(b) A service member or other person seeking to enforce rights pursuant to this chapter shall not be required to pay a filing fee or court costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 385, Sec. 12.   (AB 2365)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

813.

(a) Any person who receives a good faith request from a service member for relief pursuant to this chapter and who believes the request is incomplete or otherwise not legally sufficient, or that the service member is not entitled to the relief requested, shall, within 30 days of the request, provide the service member with a written response acknowledging the request, setting forth the person’s basis for believing or asserting that the request is incomplete or not legally sufficient, or that the service member is not entitled to the relief requested. The response shall clearly identify the specific information or materials that are missing from the request and that would be required to grant the relief requested, and provide
 contact information, including a mailing address and telephone number, which the service member can use to contact the person.

(b) If the person fails to make such a response in the timeframe set forth in this section, the person waives any objection to the request, and the service member shall be entitled to the relief requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 21.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.3. California Military Families Financial Relief Act of 2005 [820. - 830.]

820.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “California Military Families Financial Relief Act of 2005.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

821.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Service member” means either of the following:

(1) A member of the militia, as defined in Section 120, called or ordered into military service pursuant to Section 143 or 146 or federal law.

(2) A member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, as defined by Section 101 of Title 10 of the United States Code, who is ordered to active duty pursuant to federal law.

(b) “Military orders” means, with respect to a service member, official
 military orders, or any notification, certification, or verification from the service member’s commanding officer, with respect to the service member’s current or future military duty status.

(c) “Military service” means either of the following:

(1) Full-time active state service or full-time active federal service of a service member who is a member of the militia, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Full-time active duty of a service member who is a reservist, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), for a period of no less than 30 consecutive days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 22.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

No county recorder in this state may impose a fee for the recordation of a power of attorney to act as the agent for a service member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 23.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

823.

(a) Any service member who is in military service, or any spouse or legal dependent of that service member, may terminate, without penalty, a mobile telephony services contract that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) It is entered into on or after the effective date of this section.

(2) It is executed by or on behalf of the service member who is in military service, or by any spouse or legal dependent of that service member.

(b) Termination of the mobile telephony services contract shall not be effective until both of the following occur:

(1) Thirty days after the service member who is in military service or the spouse or legal dependent gives notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the intention to terminate the mobile telephony services contract, and provides a copy of the service member’s activation or deployment order and any other information that substantiates the duration of the service member’s military service.

(2) Unless the service member who is in military service, or any spouse or legal dependent of that service member, owns the mobile communication device, the mobile communication device is returned to the custody or control of the mobile telephony services company, or the service member who is in military service or the service member’s spouse or legal dependent agrees in writing to return the mobile communication device as soon as practicable after the military service is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

823.5.

(a) No person or entity licensed under the Business and Professions Code, Corporations Code, Financial Code, or Insurance Code shall market financial services or products to a service member or former service member, or the spouse of a service member or former service member, in a misleading or deceptive manner that suggests any of the following:

(1) That the person or entity marketing the financial service or product is acting on behalf of one or more branches of the United States military or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(2) That the person or entity marketing the
 financial service or product is an affiliate of one or more branches of the United States military or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(3) That the financial service or product is being offered on behalf of one or more branches of the United States military or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) If a person who violates this section is licensed under any state licensing law, a violation of this section shall be deemed a violation of the laws under which that person is licensed.

(c) This section shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any bank as defined in Section 103 of the Financial Code.

(2) Any credit union as defined in Section 14002 of the Financial Code.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Service member” means a member of an active duty or reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States or of the active militia, as defined by Section 120.

(2) “Former service member” means a veteran as defined by Section 980.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 24.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

824.

(a) An institution shall, upon request, grant an academic leave of absence for military service to any student who is a member of the active militia, as defined by Section 120, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, as defined by Section 101 of Title 10 of the United States Code, who is ordered to active duty pursuant to Section 143 or 146 or federal law.

(b) If requested by a student granted an academic leave of absence for military service, not later than one year after the student’s release from military service, other than a dishonorable release, the institution in which the student is enrolled shall do one of the following, as elected by the
 student:

(1) The institution shall make arrangements to reasonably accommodate and assist the student so that they are able to meet any and all coursework requirements that they may have missed due to military service.

(2) The institution shall refund the tuition and fees paid by the student for the academic term in which the student is required to report for military service regardless of whether the student was called to military service before the academic term had commenced or after the academic term had commenced. The refund shall equal 100 percent of the tuition and fee charges the student paid the institution for the applicable academic term.

(c) If requested by a student granted an academic leave of absence
 for military service, not later than one year after the student’s release from military service, other than a dishonorable release, the institution shall restore the student to the educational status the student had attained prior to being called to military service without loss of academic credits earned, scholarships or grants awarded, or tuition and other fees paid prior to the commencement of military service.

(d) If an institution fails to comply with this section, the student may bring an action against the institution to enforce its provisions in any court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the student resides. If the student resides outside of this state, the action shall be brought in the court of the county in which the campus of the institution previously attended by the student is located. The court may award
 reasonable attorney’s fees and expenses if the student prevails in the action.

(e) The Legislature hereby requests that the University of California adopt policies similar to those set forth in this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, “institution” includes any public postsecondary educational institution and any private postsecondary educational institution, as defined in Section 94858 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 67.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

825.

The State Bar of California shall waive the membership fees of any member who is a service member if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The member was in good standing with the State Bar of California at the time the member enters into military service.

(b) The membership fees are for the period for which the service member is in military service.

(c) The service member, or the service member’s spouse, provides written notice to the State Bar of California that substantiates the service member’s military service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

(a) On or after the effective date of the act adding this chapter, any service member who terminates a motor vehicle lease pursuant to the federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, or pursuant to Section 409, shall be allowed by the lessor to make payment of any arrearages and other obligations that are due and unpaid at the time of termination of the lease in equal installments over a period equal to at least the period of military service.

(b) Any person who files
 or completes a notice, application, or certification of lien sale or certificate of repossession shall, as part of that document, state under penalty of perjury that the lien sale or repossession was conducted in accordance with the requirements of Sections 407, 408, 409.1, and 409.3, and with the requirements of Sections 3952, 3953, and 3958 of Title 50 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 26.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

(a) A qualified customer may apply for and shall receive shutoff protection from a service provider for a period of 180 days. The service provider may grant extensions after the initial 180-day period.

(b) A qualified customer may apply for shutoff protection for utility service by notifying the service provider that they are in need of assistance because of a reduction in household income as the result of a member of a qualified household being called to active duty status in the military.

(c) Notification of the need for assistance shall be submitted in writing and accompanied by a copy of the activation or deployment order
 of a service member that specifies the duration of the active duty status. The written notification shall also include self-certification that the qualified household of the qualified customer will be occupied by the qualified customer’s legal dependent or dependents during the duration of the shutoff protection period.

(d) A qualified customer receiving assistance under this section shall notify the service provider if the active duty status of the service member will be extended.

(e) If the qualified customer moves out of the residence that is receiving shutoff protection, they shall provide the service provider a written notice that includes the date of service termination and a forwarding address.

(f) Unless waived by
 the service provider, the shutoff protection provided under this section shall not void or limit the obligation of the qualified customer to pay for utility services received during the time of assistance.

(g) All service providers shall do the following:

(1) Establish a repayment plan requiring minimum monthly payments that allows the qualified customer to pay any past due amounts over a reasonable time period not to exceed one year after the service member’s release from active military duty.

(2) Not charge late payment fees or interest to the qualified customer during the period of military service or the repayment period.

(h) This section shall not affect
 or amend any rules or orders of the Public Utilities Commission pertaining to billing standards.

(i) If terms and conditions under this section are not followed by the qualified customer, the service provider may follow its procedures and rules on customer standards and billing practices for providing electric, water, and gas residential services.

(j) For public utilities regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, the commission shall allow recovery of reasonable costs incurred to implement this section.

(k) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Service provider” means a provider of utility services, including, but not limited to, public utilities that are subject to
 the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission, local publicly owned electric utilities, as defined by Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code, and public water, sewer, or solid waste collection services, or any combination thereof. “Service provider” does not include any corporation described in subdivision (a) of Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) “Qualified customer” means the customer of record of a qualified household.

(3) A “qualified household” is a residential household for which the income is reduced because the customer of record, the spouse of the customer of record, or the registered domestic partner of the customer of record, as defined by Section 297.5 of the Family Code, is a service member called to full-time active military service under
 Section 143 or 146 or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 68.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

The Military Department shall, to the extent reasonable and feasible, inform all members of the militia of the benefits and protections provided by this act, and of similar benefits and protections provided by any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

829.

(a) A person violating any provision of this chapter shall be liable for actual damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs incurred by the service member or other person entitled to the benefits and protections of this chapter.

(b) A service member or other person seeking to enforce rights pursuant to this chapter shall not be required to pay a filing fee or court costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 385, Sec. 13.   (AB 2365)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

830.

(a) Any person who receives a good faith request from a service member for relief pursuant to this chapter and who believes the request is incomplete or otherwise not legally sufficient, or that the service member is not entitled to the relief requested, shall, within 30 days of the request, provide the service member with a written response acknowledging the request, setting forth the person’s basis for believing or asserting that the request is incomplete or not legally sufficient, or that the service member is not entitled to the relief requested. The response shall clearly identify the specific information or materials that are missing from the request and that would be required to grant the relief requested, and provide
 contact information, including a mailing address and telephone number, which the service member can use to contact the person.

(b) If the person fails to make such a response in the timeframe set forth in this section, the person waives any objection to the request, and the service member shall be entitled to the relief requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 28.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. California National Guard Surviving Spouses and Children Relief Act of 2004 [850. - 852.]

850.

(a) The state shall pay a ten thousand dollar ($10,000) death benefit to the surviving spouse of, or a beneficiary designated by, any member of the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia who dies or is killed after March 1, 2003, in the performance of duty.

(b) The Military Department shall determine if the death occurred in the performance of the member’s duty, and shall issue a certificate of benefit eligibility under this section within 20 days of application by the surviving spouse or a
 designated beneficiary.

(c) The state shall pay the death benefit within 10 days of the receipt of the certificate of benefit eligibility from the surviving spouse or a beneficiary designated by the service member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 42.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

851.

This chapter shall become operative upon the operative date of an appropriation by the Legislature for the purpose of funding the payments of military benefits, as required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Note: This section prescribed conditions for operation of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 850), which were satisfied in Section 852, as added September 22, 2005, by Stats. 2005, Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

852.

There is hereby appropriated the sum of one hundred thirty thousand dollars ($130,000) from the General Fund to the Military Department for the purpose of paying death benefits, as prescribed by this chapter, to the families of members of the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia who have lost their lives in the performance of duty, as determined by the Military Department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 43.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.6. Nonassignability of Veterans’ Benefits [870. - 870.]

870.

A person shall not advertise, offer, or enter into an agreement with a pension beneficiary that would involve an assignment of pension benefits that is prohibited by state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 246, Sec. 2.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.7 Certified California Veteran Service Provider [880. - 885.]

880.

(a) (1) The department shall, with existing funds or through appropriation by the Legislature, operate a competitive grant program, to be administered by the department. For purposes of this section, “existing funds” means funding already appropriated to any state department or agency, other than the department, for the purpose of providing services to veterans. The department may enter into memoranda of understanding with other state departments and agencies to implement this section.

(2) The department may cover reasonable administrative costs of implementing this section using the funds available for the competitive grant program.

(b) (1) Competitive grants shall be awarded to certified California veteran service providers, as defined in
 Section 881, for purposes of providing supportive services that improve the quality of life for veterans and their families. Supportive services may include, but are not limited to, housing assistance, health services, including mental and behavioral health services, counseling, small business assistance, case management, employment assistance, and job placement.

(2) Only a certified California veteran service provider is eligible to be awarded funds under the competitive grant program.

(3) Competitive grants shall be awarded in support of the state’s strategic plan for providing veterans with transitional assistance, as described in Section 90.

(c) The department shall, no later than July 1, 2019, develop regulations for the implementation of the program. These standards shall include, but not be limited to, the
 grant application criteria, application scoring process, data collection, and accountability for grant program expenditures and metrics for evaluation of grants made.

(d) Prior to awarding competitive grants under this section, the department shall develop regulations to define criteria for supporting the state’s strategic plan.

(e) All funds appropriated pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Certified Veteran Service Provider Program Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury, and shall be available for expenditure by the department and exclusively for the support of the department in carrying out their duties and responsibilities under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 22.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

881.

(a) “Certified California veteran service provider” means an entity applying to the competitive grant program established pursuant to this chapter and that is certified by the department as having an established history of providing supportive services and that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Provides supportive services as required by this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to the chapter.

(2) Demonstrates, through the submission of appropriate supporting data, that the veteran service provider has the knowledge, experience, and cultural competency to provide supportive services to
 veterans and their families.

(3) Demonstrates, through audits and employment history, the fiscal and management capacity to capably perform supportive services to veterans and their families.

(4) Is a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(5) Demonstrates through the submission of appropriate supporting data that the entity has effectively served the needs of veteran or veterans and their families.

(6) Demonstrates that all required filings with the Secretary of State, the office of the Attorney General, and the Franchise Tax Board are
 current. Demonstrates that the entity meets or exceeds the provisions of Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 17510) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code and complies with the standards included in the Attorney General’s Guide for Charities.
